New Jersey, session 222, S3349.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1[1. R.S.39:3-41 is amended to read as follows: 39:3-41.      a.  At the time of the issuance of an examination permit or a special learner's permit to operate a motor vehicle, the chief administrator shall make available to each applicant for the examination permit or special learner's permit a driver's manual containing information required to be known and followed by licensed drivers relating to licensing requirements. b.    At the time of any required examination for renewal of a driver's license, the chief administrator shall, upon request, make available to each applicant for renewal a copy of the manual and any supplements thereto. c.     The driver's manual, and any supplements thereto, or any other booklet or writing prepared in connection with examinations for drivers' licenses or for renewals of drivers' licenses shall contain all information necessary to answer any question on an examination for a driver's license or for a renewal of a driver's license. The chief administrator shall publish the driver's manual on the website of the commission in English and each of the three languages, other than English, most commonly spoken in the State, as determined by the chief administrator.  The chief administrator shall periodically, and at least every five years, verify the three languages, other than English, most commonly spoken in the State. d.    The chief administrator, following consultation with the organ procurement organizations designated pursuant to 42 U.S.C. s.1320b-8 to serve in the State of New Jersey, shall include in the driver's manual information explaining the provisions of the "Revised Uniform Anatomical Gift Act," P.L.2008, c.50 (C.26:6-77 et [al] seq.), the beneficial uses of donated organs and tissues, and the procedure for indicating on the driver's license the intention to make a donation pursuant to section 1 of P.L.1978, c.181 (C.39:3-12.2).  The chief administrator may distribute all remaining copies of the existing driver's manual before reprinting the manual with the information required pursuant to this subsection. e.     The chief administrator, in consultation with the Nikhil Badlani Foundation, shall include in the driver's manual information explaining the dangers of failing to comply with this State's motor vehicle traffic laws and indicating that interested drivers may take the STOP for Nikhil Safety Pledge set forth in paragraph (1) of this subsection. (1)   The "STOP for Nikhil Safety Pledge" is as follows: "In order to ensure the safety of others on the road, passengers in my car, and myself as a driver, I pledge to obey traffic laws while operating a motor vehicle, be extra cautious, and be attentive to traffic signs and signals and road conditions. Specifically: I will come to a complete stop at every "stop" sign or red traffic light, and will not proceed through a red traffic light; I will stay alert, keep two hands on the steering wheel whenever possible, and keep my mind on the road; I will talk safely by using a hands-free wireless telephone while driving if I am of lawful age to do so and refrain from texting while driving; and I will plan ahead and leave enough time to arrive at my destination." (2)   The chief administrator shall ensure that drivers have the option of taking the pledge set forth in paragraph (1) of this subsection by filling out a standard form made available at motor vehicle offices or by following instructions publicized by the chief administrator directing interested drivers to the appropriate website to complete the pledge. (3)   The chief administrator may distribute all remaining copies of the existing driver's manual before reprinting the manual with the information required pursuant to this subsection. f.     The chief administrator, in consultation with the Commissioner of Health and the Director of the Division of Highway Traffic Safety in the Department of Law and Public Safety, shall include in the driver's manual information explaining the dangers of carbon monoxide poisoning from motor vehicles and techniques for the safe operation and proper maintenance of a motor vehicle.  The chief administrator may distribute all remaining copies of any existing driver's manual before reprinting the manual with the information required pursuant to this subsection. g.    The chief administrator, in consultation with the Director of the Division of Highway Traffic Safety in the Department of Law and Public Safety, shall include in the driver's manual information pertaining to the importance of operating a motor vehicle in a manner that safely shares the roadway with pedestrians, cyclists, skaters, riders of motorized-scooters, and other non-motorized vehicles, which shall include, but not be limited to, a driver's responsibilities when approaching and passing a pedestrian or person operating a bicycle or personal conveyance on the roadway pursuant to P.L.2021, c.194 (C.39:4-92.4) and the penalties for failing to comply with these responsibilities. h.    The chief administrator, in consultation with the Director of the Division of Highway Traffic Safety in the Department of Law and Public Safety, shall include in the driver's manual information that instructs pedestrians, cyclists, skaters, riders of motorized-scooters, and riders of other non-motorized vehicles on the proper safety procedures while sharing the roadway with motorists. i.     The chief administrator, in consultation with the Attorney General, shall include in the drivers manual information regarding the rights and responsibilities of a driver when the driver is stopped by a law enforcement officer.  The chief administrator may distribute all remaining copies of any existing drivers manual before reprinting the manual with the information required pursuant to this subsection. (cf: P.L.2025, c.103, s.3)]1 11.   R.S.39:3-41 is amended to read as follows: 39:3-41.  a.  At the time of the issuance of an examination permit or a special learners permit to operate a motor vehicle, the chief administrator shall make available to each applicant for the examination permit or special learners permit a drivers manual containing information required to be known and followed by licensed drivers relating to licensing requirements. b.    At the time of any required examination for renewal of a drivers license, the chief administrator shall, upon request, make available to each applicant for renewal a copy of the manual and any supplements thereto. c.     The drivers manual, and any supplements thereto, or any other booklet or writing prepared in connection with examinations for drivers licenses or for renewals of drivers licenses shall contain all information necessary to answer any question on an examination for a drivers license or for a renewal of a drivers license. The chief administrator shall publish the drivers manual on the website of the commission in English and each of the three languages, other than English, most commonly spoken in the State, as determined by the chief administrator.  The chief administrator shall periodically, and at least every five years, verify the three languages, other than English, most commonly spoken in the State. d.    The chief administrator, following consultation with the organ procurement organizations designated pursuant to 42 U.S.C. s.1320b-8 to serve in the State of New Jersey, shall include in the drivers manual information explaining the provisions of the Revised Uniform Anatomical Gift Act, P.L.2008, c.50 (C.26:6-77 et [al] seq.), the beneficial uses of donated organs and tissues, and the procedure for indicating on the drivers license the intention to make a donation pursuant to section 1 of P.L.1978, c.181 (C.39:3-12.2).  The chief administrator may distribute all remaining copies of the existing drivers manual before reprinting the manual with the information required pursuant to this subsection. e.     The chief administrator, in consultation with the Nikhil Badlani Foundation, shall include in the drivers manual information explaining the dangers of failing to comply with this States motor vehicle traffic laws and indicating that interested drivers may take the STOP for Nikhil Safety Pledge set forth in paragraph (1) of this subsection. (1)   The STOP for Nikhil Safety Pledge is as follows: In order to ensure the safety of others on the road, passengers in my car, and myself as a driver, I pledge to obey traffic laws while operating a motor vehicle, be extra cautious, and be attentive to traffic signs and signals and road conditions.  Specifically: I will come to a complete stop at every stop sign or red traffic light and will not proceed through a red traffic light; I will stay alert, keep two hands on the steering wheel whenever possible and keep my mind on the road; I will talk safely by using a hands-free wireless telephone while driving if I am of lawful age to do so and refrain from texting while driving and I will plan ahead and leave enough time to arrive at my destination. (2)   The chief administrator shall ensure that drivers have the option of taking the pledge set forth in paragraph (1) of this subsection by filling out a standard form made available at motor vehicle offices or by following instructions publicized by the chief administrator directing interested drivers to the appropriate website to complete the pledge. (3)   The chief administrator may distribute all remaining copies of the existing drivers manual before reprinting the manual with the information required pursuant to this subsection. f.     The chief administrator, in consultation with the Commissioner of Health and the Director of the Division of Highway Traffic Safety in the Department of Law and Public Safety, shall include in the drivers manual information explaining the dangers of carbon monoxide poisoning from motor vehicles and techniques for the safe operation and proper maintenance of a motor vehicle.  The chief administrator may distribute all remaining copies of any existing drivers manual before reprinting the manual with the information required pursuant to this subsection. g.    The chief administrator, in consultation with the Director of the Division of Highway Traffic Safety in the Department of Law and Public Safety, shall include in the drivers manual information pertaining to the importance of operating a motor vehicle in a manner that safely shares the roadway with pedestrians, cyclists, skaters, riders of motorized-scooters, and other non-motorized vehicles, which shall include, but not be limited to, a drivers responsibilities when approaching and passing a pedestrian or person operating a bicycle or personal conveyance on the roadway pursuant to section 1 of P.L.2021, c.194 (C.39:4-92.4) and the penalties for failing to comply with these responsibilities. h.    The chief administrator, in consultation with the Director of the Division of Highway Traffic Safety in the Department of Law and Public Safety, shall include in the drivers manual information that instructs pedestrians, cyclists, skaters, riders of motorized scooters, and riders of other non-motorized vehicles on the proper safety procedures while sharing the roadway with motorists. i.     The chief administrator, in consultation with the Director of the Division of Highway Traffic Safety in the Department of Law and Public Safety, shall include in the drivers manual information that instructs motorists on the importance of changing lanes or reducing the speed of their vehicles and being prepared to stop when approaching a stationary vehicle that is displaying flashing or blinking lights, as required by section 1 of P.L.2009, c.5 (C.39:4-92.2). j.     The chief administrator, in consultation with the Attorney General, shall include in the drivers manual information regarding the rights and responsibilities of a driver when the driver is stopped by a law enforcement officer.  The chief administrator may distribute all remaining copies of any existing drivers manual before reprinting the manual with the information required pursuant to this subsection.1 (cf: P.L.2025, c.248, s.3) 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the seventh month after enactment, but the Chief Administrator of the Motor Vehicle Commission may take anticipatory administrative action in advance thereof as shall be necessary for the implementation of the act.